dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK-2.5.024.dic
adelade/26,12,42,102 ph:jsjd
hejsa/26,12,42
advisere/26,12,42,102
advisere/26,12,42,102
børnebillet/26,12,42,102
falkeblik/12,20
femårig/25,12,49
filister/16,12,15,32
filter/12,19,32
filtre/12,19
firelinjet/12,27
fleksibilitet/12
flippe/3,22,23
flod/12,13,4
folkedemokratisk/29,23,23
fordelingsmæssig/25,12,49
fordøjelig/24,12,49
forkæle/3,22,23
forskel/12,21
forskningsbaseret/12,27
forstumme/3,22,23
forstærker/7,4,12,32
fortællemæssig/25,12,49
forvanskning/12,13,4
forælder/16,12,15
foster/12,17,15,32
fred/12
fremtidig/24,12,49
fremtidsorienteret/12,27
frygtsom/3,28
fundamentere/3,22,23
fyr/18,12
fødselsøjeblik/12,20
føntørrer/12,21
førstebehandle/3,22,23
galvanometer/12,17,15,32
garanti/12,13,4,32
gennemstrømningshastighed/12,13,4
genremæssig/25,12,49
geofysisk/29,23,23
glarmester/16,12,15
glasmester/16,12,15
glemsom/3,28
glædelig/24,12,49
godte/3,22,23
golf/12,13,4,32
gravimeter/12,17,15,32
gruppere/3,22,23
grænseby/12,13,4
hamburgerryg/12,21
hammertåens/12
hankønnet/12,27
havretlig/25,12,49
heksameter/12,17,15,32
historiografisk/29,23,23
historisk/29,23,23
hjernecenter/12,17,15
hoffærdig/24,12,49
huk/12,21
hul/12,5,32
hurraråb/12,46,6
hushovmester/16,12,15
hvilsom/3,28
hydrometer/12,17,15,32
hæfteplaster/12,17,15
hæftestraf/12,20
højreorienteret/12,27
ignorant/12,13,4
indbage/22,23
inddæmme/3,22,23
indholdsmæssig/25,12,49
indonesisk/29,23,23
instruktionsbogen/12
jomfrudom/12,21
jomfrukloster/12,17,15
judo/12,32
kalorimeter/12,17,15,32
kane/3,22,23
katteagtig/24,12,49
kattedronning/12,13,4
kenderblik/12,20
keramisk/29,23,23
kirtelfeber/16,12,15
klunte/3,22,23
kodenummer/12,15,6,32
kognitiv/25,12,49
koldfeber/16,12,15
kongrescenter/12,17,15
kontraktsum/12,9
kranievæg/12,21
krystallisere/3,22,23
kubistisk/29,23,23
kultusminister/16,12,15
kvæler/7,4,12,32
kærlighedsaffære/12,13,4
kølergitter/12,15,6,32
kønnet/12,27
landsskadelig/24,12,49
langsom/3,28
leksikal/25,12,49
lillesøster/16,12,15,32
live/3,22,23,32
livsmønster/12,17,15
loftlem/12,21
luftnummer/12,15,6,32
luks/7,4,12
lyksalig/24,12,49
lymfatisk/29,23,23
lytte/3,22,23,32
målforskel/12,21
mangeårig/25,12,49
mannequin/12,13,4,32
marchere/3,22,23
markedsstyret/12,27
meddelsom/3,28
midvinter/16,12,15,32
mikroliter/16,12,15
mikroskopisk/29,23,23
miljøborgmester/16,12,15
mismodig/24,12,49
mormor/12,32
mylder/12,17,15
naje/3,22,23
nar/18,12
natportier/12,13,4
naturretlig/25,12,49
naturrigdom/12,21
nazistisk/29,23,23
niveau/12,6,13,32
nonnekloster/12,17,15
nænsom/3,28
næringsrigtig/24,12,49
næste/3,22,23
oleander/16,12,15
opdragelsesmæssig/25,12,49
opmærksom/3,28
orgelregister/12,17,15
overdosere/3,22,23
overdynge/3,22,23
overfrisk/29,23,23
oversidder/7,4,12
paginering/12,13,4
påpasselig/24,12,49
pasnummer/12,15,6,32
personalemæssig/25,12,49
piaster/16,12,15
pig/12,21
pile/3,22,23,32
politologisk/29,23,23
polymerisere/3,22,23
potentiometer/12,17,15,32
problemorienteret/12,27
protektionistisk/29,23,23
pyknometer/12,17,15,32
racehygiejnisk/29,23,23
racercykel/12,64,65,35,32
raffinement/12,6,13
reb/12,46,6,32
regelorienteret/12,27
rejsebrev/12,20
rem/12,21
renæssanceslot/12,20
revaluere/3,22,23
ringfinger/16,12,15,32
rønne/12,13,4,32
sabelkat/12,21
sagkyndig/25,12,49
sansemotorisk/29,23,23
sanseverdnerne/12,13,4
seismisk/29,23,23
sildebensmønster/12,17,15
sildig/24,12,49
skånsom/3,28
skibsførereksamin/12
skibsregister/12,17,15
skifret/12,27
skinne/3,22,23
skoliose/12,32
skuemester/16,12,15
slankedrik/12,21
slidsom/3,28
slot/12,20
sommerslot/12,20
sorbisk/29,23,23
specie/12,13,4
spejder/7,4,12,32
splejse/3,22,23
sprælle/3,22,23
statsminister/16,12,15,32
statsteater/12,17,15,32
stikordsregister/12,17,15
stjernegage/12,13,4
stræbsom/3,28
stub/12,21,32
sædvanemæssig/25,12,49
sødygtig/24,12,49
tanke/12,13,4,32
telemeter/12,17,15,32
tendere/3,22,23
termojakke/12,13,4,32
termostatstyret/12,27
tidsalder/16,12,15
tilklistre/3,22,23
tjenestefolks/12
torneroseslot/12,20
trapezformet/12,27
trykkammer/12,15,6,32
træl/12,21,67
tvangsneurotisk/29,23,23
tvivlsom/3,28
uaflåset/12,27
ubeslutsom/3,28
ublodig/24,12,49
udenretlig/25,12,49
udpegning/12,13,4
umeddelsom/3,28
umistelig/24,12,49
underjordisk/29,23,23
urfjeder/16,12,15
urocenter/12,17,15,32
uskånsom/3,28
uundværlig/24,12,49
uvirksom/3,28
vandbaseret/12,27
vandvæsnets/12,13
vestorienteret/12,27
viderebearbejde/3,22,23
